Hawaii statutes.
[§236D-2.3] Effect of civil
union. All provisions of the Internal Revenue Code referred to in this
chapter that apply to a husband and wife, spouses, or person in a legal marital
relationship shall be deemed to apply in this chapter to partners in a civil
union with the same force and effect as if they were "husband and
wife", "spouses", or other terms that describe persons in a
legal marital relationship. [L 2011, c 1, §5]

Note

Section applies to taxable years beginning after December 31,
2011. L 2011, c 1, §10.

Attorney General Opinions

Civil union partners have all the same rights, benefits,
protections, and responsibilities under the law as married couples who are of
the opposite gender; civil union partners have the same tax filing status options
as married couples who are of the opposite gender for Hawaii income tax
purposes for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2011. Att. Gen. Op.
11-2.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next